Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Article 2. Scholarships.

§ 23.1-612.
Unfunded scholarships.

The governing board of each public institution of higher education may establish unfunded scholarships that are subject to such regulations and conditions as the governing board establishes and the following limitations and restrictions:

All such scholarships shall be applied exclusively to the remission, in whole or in part, of tuition and mandatory fees.

The governing board shall determine the number of such scholarships annually awarded to undergraduate Virginia students and non-Virginia students.

The total value of all such scholarships annually awarded to undergraduate Virginia students shall not exceed the amount of the applicable sum of undergraduate tuition and mandatory fees multiplied by 20 percent of the enrollment of undergraduate Virginia students during the preceding academic year.

The total value of all such scholarships annually awarded by an institution to undergraduate non-Virginia students shall not exceed the amount of the applicable per capita out-of-state tuition differential paid by undergraduate non-Virginia students for tuition and mandatory fees multiplied by 20 percent of the enrollment of undergraduate non-Virginia students during the preceding academic year.

All such scholarships awarded to undergraduate students shall be awarded only to students in the first four years of undergraduate work and shall be awarded and renewed on a selective basis to students of character and ability who are in need of financial assistance. For purposes of determining need under this section, each governing board shall use a nationally recognized needs-analysis system approved by the Council.

The governing board of each public institution of higher education shall determine the number of such scholarships annually awarded to graduate students or teachers serving as clinical faculty pursuant to § 22.1-290.1. The total value of all such scholarships annually awarded to such graduate students and clinical faculty shall not exceed the amount of the sum of graduate tuition and mandatory fees multiplied by the number of teachers serving as clinical faculty pursuant to § 22.1-290.1 and graduate students who are employed as teaching assistants, graduate assistants, or research assistants with significant academic or academic support responsibilities and who are paid a stipend of at least $2,000 in the particular academic year. All unfunded scholarships awarded to graduate students or teachers serving as clinical faculty shall be awarded and renewed on a selective basis to such graduate students and clinical faculty of character and ability.

An unfunded scholarship shall entitle the holder to the following award, as appropriate:

An undergraduate Virginia student may receive an annual remission of an amount not to exceed the cost of tuition and mandatory fees;

An undergraduate non-Virginia student may receive an annual remission not to exceed the amount of the out-of-state tuition differential required to be paid by the student for tuition and mandatory fees;

A qualified graduate student may receive an annual remission of an amount not to exceed the cost of tuition and mandatory fees; and

A teacher serving as clinical faculty may receive an award as determined by the governing board of the institution.

No public institution of higher education shall remit any tuition or mandatory fees to any student at such institution except as authorized in this section. Each such institution shall make a report to the Council, upon request, showing the number and value of scholarships awarded under this section according to each student classification.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent or limit in any way the admission of state cadets at Virginia Military Institute or to affect the remission of tuition, mandatory fees, or other charges to such state cadets as permitted under existing law.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect or limit in any way the control of the governing boards of the respective institutions over (i) any other scholarships, (ii) any gifts or donations made to such institutions for scholarships or other special purposes, (iii) any funds provided by the federal government or otherwise for the purpose of career and technical education or vocational rehabilitation in the Commonwealth, or (iv) any funds derived from endowment or appropriations from the federal government for instruction in agriculture and mechanic arts at land-grant universities.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the governing board of any public institution of higher education from fixing a tuition charge for Virginia students reasonably lower than that for non-Virginia students.

Nothing in this section or any other provision of law shall prohibit the awarding of 10 full tuition unfunded scholarships each year by Old Dominion University under the terms and conditions provided for in a deed conveying certain property in Norfolk known as the Old Larchmont School made July 5, 1930, between the City of Norfolk and The College of William and Mary in Virginia.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit other financial aid programs provided pursuant to state law.

8.

Notwithstanding the limitations on the awards of unfunded scholarships to undergraduate students pursuant to subdivision A 7, an institution may award unfunded scholarships to visiting foreign exchange students as long as the number of such awards in any fiscal year does not exceed one quarter of one percent of the total institutional headcount enrollment.

History.

Code 1919, § 993; 1936, p. 447, § 23-31; 1952, c. 139; 1964, c. 440; 1966, c. 621; 1974, c. 317; 1975, c. 397; 1976, c. 189; 1977, cc. 296, 319; 1979, cc. 136, 145, 730; 1990, c. 447; 1992, c. 103; 1996, c. 103; 1999, cc. 424, 437; 2001, c. 483; 2002, cc. 158, 257; 2004, cc. 58, 176, 195, 739; 2014, c. 594; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-613.
Alumni scholarships.

The alumni association of any public institution of higher education may provide for and maintain a scholarship fund by annual contributions under such criteria as may be prescribed.

History.

Code 1919, § 997, § 23-35; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-614.
Nursing scholarships.

As used in this section:“Graduate nursing program” means a program at a school of nursing that leads to a master’s degree or doctorate in nursing or a field relating to nursing activities.“Undergraduate nursing program” means a program at a school of nursing that leads to an associate degree, diploma, or baccalaureate degree in nursing.

Annual nursing scholarships are established for part-time and full-time Virginia students enrolled in undergraduate and graduate nursing programs or first-year Virginia students at the beginning of their first academic year who present to the advisory committee established pursuant to subsection D a notice of intention to pursue an undergraduate nursing program.

Undergraduate nursing scholarships shall not exceed $2,000 annually. Graduate nursing scholarships shall not exceed $4,000 annually. No scholarship shall be less than $150 annually. Scholarship funds shall be paid directly to the recipient.

Each nursing scholarship shall be made by an advisory committee appointed by the State Board of Health that consists of eight members, four of whom shall be deans or directors of schools of nursing or their designees, two of whom shall be past recipients of nursing scholarships awarded pursuant to this section, two of whom shall have experience in the administration of student financial aid programs, and at least two of whom shall not have served as members of the advisory committee during the previous two years. Appointments shall be for two-year terms. No member of the advisory committee is eligible to serve more than two consecutive two-year terms immediately succeeding any unexpired term for which such member was appointed.

Awards shall be made upon such basis, competitive or otherwise, as determined by the advisory committee, with due regard for scholastic attainments, character, need, and adaptability of the applicant for the service contemplated in such award. No award shall be made if the applicant fails to possess the requisite qualifications. With due consideration of the number of applications and the qualifications of all such applicants, the advisory committee shall, to the extent that it is practicable, award an equal number of scholarships among the various congressional districts within the Commonwealth.

Before any such scholarship is awarded, the applicant shall agree in a signed written contract to complete a nursing program and, upon completion, to promptly begin and continuously engage in nursing work in the Commonwealth in a region with a critical shortage of nurses for one month for each $100 of scholarship awarded. The requirement for continuous engagement in nursing work may be waived by the advisory committee if the scholarship recipient requests leave to pursue an undergraduate or graduate degree in nursing or relating to nursing activities. The contract shall contain such other provisions as the State Board of Health determines to be necessary to accomplish the purposes of the scholarship.

Each scholarship shall be awarded for a single award year and may be renewed annually for up to four additional award years upon a showing of satisfactory progress toward completion of the relevant nursing program.

History.

1950, pp. 1291, 1292, §§ 23-35.9, 23-35.10, 23-35.11, 23-35.12, 23-35.13; 1956, c. 644; 1962, c. 81; 1966, c. 162; 1968, c. 441; 1970, c. 653; 1973, c. 401; 1974, c. 654; 1989, c. 330; 2002, c. 290; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-615.
Soil scientist scholarships.

The Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University Board of Visitors may establish up to 20 annual soil scientist scholarships for Virginia students in an amount equal to tuition and mandatory fees at Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University.

Each scholarship award shall be made upon such basis, competitive or otherwise, as is determined by the president or other proper officer of the institution of higher education (institution) that the applicant plans to attend, with due regard to the scholastic achievements, character, and adaptability of the applicant to the service contemplated under such award. No award shall be made unless the applicant possesses the requisite qualifications.

Each such scholarship shall be awarded for a single award year and may be renewed annually for up to three additional award years upon a showing of satisfactory progress.

Before any such scholarship is awarded, the applicant shall agree in a signed written contract to pursue soil science at the institution at which the scholarship is awarded until his graduation and, upon graduating, to promptly begin and engage continuously as a soil scientist as an employee of the Commonwealth for as many years as he was a beneficiary of such scholarship, unless no such suitable vacancy exists as an employee of the Commonwealth, in which case the obligation of such contract shall be discharged by being continuously engaged in the Commonwealth as a soil scientist as an employee of a local, state, or federal government agency for as many years as he was a beneficiary of such scholarship. The contract shall contain such other provisions as Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University deems necessary to accomplish the purposes of the scholarship. In the event that the holder of any awarded soil scientist scholarship dies while receiving instruction under such a scholarship, any balance unpaid and agreed to be repaid by the holder of such scholarship shall be deemed paid, and no liability shall be attached to his estate.

Such contract shall contain a clause under which the applicant shall be relieved of his obligation to serve the Commonwealth as a soil scientist, for a period equal to that during which he was a beneficiary of such scholarship, at any time that he (i) fails to maintain a scholastic standard at least equal to the standard required of the general student body at such institution or (ii) becomes permanently disabled and is not able to engage in the profession of soil scientist, upon certification by a faculty committee. Any applicant so relieved shall arrange to reimburse the Commonwealth for the amount received on account of such scholarship plus interest on such amount computed at the prevailing rate charged on student loans at the institution attended by the applicant. Any applicant who so reimburses the Commonwealth and subsequently fulfills the terms of his contract by completing his studies and serving the Commonwealth as a soil scientist for a period equal to that during which he received such scholarship shall be reimbursed from the general fund of the state treasury the amount of the scholarship and interest previously repaid to the Commonwealth. This reimbursement shall be made on any contract made under the provisions of this subsection.

All funds repaid by any applicant pursuant to subsection E shall be paid into the state treasury and shall become a part of the general fund. The governing board of the institution attended by the applicant shall collect such payments and shall pay all moneys so received into the state treasury promptly. If any applicant fails to abide by the terms of such contract, such fact shall be communicated to the Attorney General by the proper officer of the institution or by the employing state agency. The Attorney General shall take such action as he deems proper.

The funds making up each scholarship shall be paid to the recipient or applied toward the payment of his expenses at the relevant institution in such a manner and at such a time during the academic year as the president or other proper officer determines.

There is appropriated to Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University from the general fund of the state treasury the sum of $8,000 each year of the biennium for carrying out the purpose of this section.

History.

1970, c. 620, §§ 23-38.3, 23-38.4, 23-38.5, 23-38.6, 23-38.7, 23-38.9, 23-38.10; 1972, c. 188; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-615.1.
Enslaved Ancestors College Access Scholarship and Memorial Program.

The Enslaved Ancestors College Access Scholarship and Memorial Program (the Program) is established for the purpose of reckoning with the history of the Commonwealth, addressing the long legacy of slavery in the Commonwealth, and acknowledging that the foundational success of several public institutions of higher education was based on the labor of enslaved individuals.

Consistent with the purpose set forth in subsection A, Longwood University, the University of Virginia, Virginia Commonwealth University, the Virginia Military Institute, and The College of William and Mary in Virginia shall each implement and execute the Program, with any source of funds other than state funds or tuition or fee increases, by annually (i) identifying and memorializing, to the extent possible, all enslaved individuals who labored on former and current institutionally controlled grounds and property and (ii) providing a tangible benefit such as a college scholarship or community-based economic development program for individuals or specific communities with a demonstrated historic connection to slavery that will empower families to be lifted out of the cycle of poverty.

The Council shall collaborate with the institutions set forth in subsection B to establish guidelines for the implementation of the Program, including guidelines for the identification of all enslaved individuals who labored on former and current institutionally controlled grounds and property, the development of appropriate means to memorialize these individuals, the development of programs for individuals and communities still experiencing the legacy of slavery to empower them to break the cycle of poverty, eligibility criteria for participation in such programs, and the duration of such programs.

Each institution set forth in subsection B shall continue the activities set forth in subsection B pursuant to the Program for a period equal in length to the period during which the institution used enslaved individuals to support the institution or until scholarships have been awarded to a number of recipients equal to 100 percent of the population of enslaved individuals identified pursuant to subsection B who labored on former and current institutionally controlled grounds and property, whichever occurs first.

Each institution set forth in subsection B shall annually submit to the Council information on the implementation of the Program. The Council shall compile such information in a report and submit such report no later than November 1 of each year to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations, the House Committee on Education, the Senate Committee on Education and Health, the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, and the Virginia African American Advisory Board.

Each private institution of higher education with a legacy of slavery that is similar to that of any institution set forth in subsection B is strongly encouraged to participate in the Program on a voluntary basis.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 442.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 442, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia shall collaborate with Longwood University, the University of Virginia, Virginia Commonwealth University, the Virginia Military Institute, and The College of William and Mary in Virginia to establish guidelines for the Enslaved Ancestors College Access Scholarship and Memorial Program, as created by this act, pursuant to the provisions of this act no later than July 1, 2022.”

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.

§ 23.1-616.
Stephen J. Wright Scholars Program established.

The Graduate Student Recruitment Program and the Southern Regional Education Board Minority Doctoral Program established in the general appropriation act are renamed and established as the Stephen J. Wright Scholars Program for the purpose of fostering scholarship among the Commonwealth’s graduate students and retaining the Commonwealth’s outstanding and promising young adults through awards based on scholarship and achievement.

History.

1997, cc. 713, 746, § 23-38.53:11; 2016, c. 588.